da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Opbevaring og organisering > Opbevaringskroge og -stativer > Paraplyholdere og -stativer: Paraplystativer; Paraplyholdere
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Varasto ja säilytys > Säilytyskoukut ja -telineet > Silityslautatelineet: Sateenvarjotelineet; Sateenvarjojalustat
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Storage & Organization > Storage Hooks & Racks > Umbrella Stands & Racks: Umbrella Racks; Umbrella Stands
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 储物/收纳 > 挂钩和置物架 > 伞架: 雨伞架; 伞搁架
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 収納 > 収納用フック・ラック > 傘立て: 傘ラック; 傘スタンド
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Αποθήκευση & οργάνωση > Γάντζοι & ράφια αποθήκευσης > Βάσεις & ράφια ομπρελών: Ράφια ομπρελών; Βάσεις ομπρελών
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Immagazzinamento e organizzazione > Ganci e portaabiti > Portaombrelli e supporti per ombrelli: Portaombrelli; Supporti per ombrelli
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Förvaring och organisation > Förvaringskrokar och hyllor > Paraplyställ och hyllor: Paraplyställ; Paraplyhyllor
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > การจัดเก็บและการจัดระเบียบ > ตะขอและชั้นเก็บของ > ที่ตั้งและราวสำหรับร่ม: ชั้นวางร่ม; ที่วางร่ม
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Armazenamento e organização > Ganchos e prateleiras para armazenamento > Porta guarda-chuvas: Armações para guarda-chuvas; Suportes de guarda-chuvas
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Armazenamento e organização > Cabides e prateleiras de armazenamento > Suportes e prateleiras para guarda-chuva: Porta guarda-chuvas; Prateleiras para guarda-chuva
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés > Tárolóhorgok és -állványok > Esernyőtartók és -állványok: Esernyőállványok; Esernyőtartók
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Съхранение и организация > Куки и рафтове за съхранение > Стойки за чадъри и поставки: Поставки за чадъри; Стойки за чадъри
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 수납/정리용품 > 보관용 걸이/선반 > 우산꽂이: 우산꽂이 선반; 우산꽂이 스탠드
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Shranjevanje in organizacija > Kljuke in stojala za shranjevanje > Stojala in obešalniki za dežnike: Držala za dežnike; Stojala za dežnike
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Skladovanie a organizácia > Úložné háky a stojany > Stojany a držiaky na dáždniky: Držiaky na dáždniky; Stojany na dáždniky
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Przechowywanie i utrzymanie porządku > Haczyki i stojaki do przechowywania > Stojaki na parasolki: Wieszaki na parasolki; Stojaki na parasolki
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Rangement et organisation > Crochets et patères > Porte-parapluies: Casier à parapluies; Support pour parapluies
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Đồ chứa và dụng cụ sắp xếp đồ > Móc và giá đựng đồ > Giá và kệ để ô: Giá để ô; Kệ để ô
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Organización y almacenamiento > Perchas y estanterías > Paragüeros: Paragüeros; Soportes para paraguas
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Opruimen en organiseren > Opberghaken en -rekken > Standaards en rekken voor paraplu's: Rekken voor paraplu's; Standaards voor paraplu's
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Lagring og organisering > Lagringskroker og -stativer > Paraplystativer og -holdere: Paraplystativer; Paraplyholdere
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 儲藏和收納 > 掛勾與收納架 > 傘架: 雨傘架; 雨傘座
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Sandėliavimas ir tvarkymas > Sandėliavimo kabliukai ir lentynos > Skėčių stovai ir lentynos: Skėčių lentynos; Skėčių stovai
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Aufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme > Aufbewahrungshaken & Regale > Schirmständer & - halter: Regenschirmhalter; Schirmständer
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Odlaganje i organizacija > Kuke i stalci za pohranu > Stalci i držači za kišobrane: Stalci za kišobrane; Držači za kišobrane
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Saklama ve Düzenleme > Saklama Amaçlı Kanca ve Raflar > Şemsiye Stant ve Rafları: Şemsiye Rafları; Şemsiye Standları
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Хранение вещей > Крючки, полки и стойки для хранения > Подставки и стойки для зонтов: Стойки для зонтов; Подставки для зонтов
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Depozitare și organizare > Cârlige și suporturi de depozitare > Stative și suporturi pentru umbrele: Suporturi pentru umbrele; Stative pentru umbrele
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Uskladnění a uspořádání > Skladovací háčky a regály > Stojany na deštníky: Držáky na deštníky; Stojany na deštník